Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-149
Reimbursement to county; when; procedure.

The county shall be reimbursed for any medical assistance or health services by the spouse, father, or mother of any recipient if they or any of them are of sufficient ability. A proceeding may be instituted in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against such relative for reimbursement of medical care or health services made to or on behalf of a recipient at any time prior to the expiration of one year after the date of the last assistance payment. Suit shall be instituted in the name of the county.

Laws 1984, LB 886, § 7.